Hawaii statutes.
§481P-3 Abusive telemarketing acts or
practices. It is an abusive telemarketing act or practice and a violation
of this chapter for any seller or telephone solicitor to engage in the
following conduct:

(1) Threaten, intimidate, or use profane or obscene
language;

(2) Request a fee to remove derogatory information
from or to improve a consumer's credit history or credit record until:

(A) The time frame in which the seller or
telephone solicitor has represented that all of the goods or services will be
provided to that consumer has expired; and

(B) The seller or telephone solicitor has
provided the consumer with documentation in the form of a credit report from a
credit reporting agency demonstrating that the promised results have been
achieved, the report having been issued more than six months after the results
were achieved. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect the
requirement of section 604 of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. section
1681b, that a consumer report may only be obtained for a specified permissible
purpose;

(3) Request or receive payment from a consumer to
recover or otherwise aid in the return of money or any other item lost by the
consumer in a telemarketing transaction, until seven business days after the money
or other item is delivered to the consumer;

(4) Request or actually receive payment of any fee in
advance of obtaining a loan or other extension of credit when a high likelihood
of success has been represented to the consumer by the seller or telephone
solicitor;

(5) Cause the telephone to ring more than ten times
in an outbound telephone call;

(6) Engage any consumer repeatedly or continuously
with behavior a reasonable person would deem to be annoying, abusive, or
harassing;

(7) Initiate an outbound telephone call to a
consumer, when the person has stated previously that the consumer does not wish
to receive telephone calls from that seller or telephone solicitor; provided
that the seller or telephone solicitor will not be liable for violating this
paragraph if:

(A) It has established and implemented
written procedures to comply with this paragraph, which procedures shall meet
the minimum standards set forth in 47 C.F.R. section 64.1200(e)(2);

(B) It has trained its personnel in the
procedures established pursuant to subparagraph (A);

(C) The seller, or telephone solicitor acting
on behalf of the seller, has maintained and recorded lists of persons who may
not be contacted in compliance with this paragraph; and

(D) The call is the result of error; or

(8) Initiate an outbound telephone call to a
consumer's residence at any time other than between 8:00 a.m. and 9:00 p.m.
local time at the location of the consumer called. [L 1999, c 170, pt of §1; am
L 2008, c 19, §38]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next